Arkansas, session 2025, SB445.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-55-101(b), concerning applications for
licensure as an electrical inspector, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) A person shall apply for licensure as an electrical inspector
on a form approved by the board within thirty (30) days of employment as an
electrical inspector.
(2) A person shall be eligible to apply for licensure as an
electrical inspector if he or she is a:
(A) Master electrician;
(B) Journeyman electrician;
(C) International Code Council Electrical Inspector with
six (6) months of employment experience as a municipal building code
enforcement official;
(D) Arkansas Fire Training Academy International Fire
Service Accreditation Congress Inspector 1 with two (2) years of employment
experience at a fire marshal's office or fire inspector's office;
(E) Arkansas Fire Training Academy International Fire
Service Accreditation Congress Inspector 2 with one (1) year of employment
experience at a fire marshal's office or fire inspector's office;
*LGL054*
04-10-2025 09:46:55 LGL054

As Engrossed: S3/19/25 H4/10/25 SB445
(F) Arkansas Fire Training Academy International Fire
Service Accreditation Congress Inspector 3 with six (6) months of employment
experience at a fire marshal's office or fire inspector's office; or
(G) Certified Electrical Inspector with a Certified
Electrical Inspector certification from the National Fire Protection
Association.
(2)(3) Applications shall be made to the board and shall contain:
(A) Proof of employment with the state or a political
subdivision of the state as an electrical inspector in the State of Arkansas;
(B)(i) Verification of work experience as required by rule
of the board.
(ii) Work experience shall include without
limitation demonstrated knowledge of:
(a) The standard materials and methods used in
the installation of electric equipment;
(b) Approved methods of construction to ensure
the safety of persons and property; and
(c) The requirements of the statewide
standards for the construction, installation, and maintenance of electrical
facilities and the performance of electrical work under § 20-31-104; and
(A) Proof of:
(i) Licensure as an electrician required under
subdivisions (b)(2)(A) and (B) of this section; or
(ii) Certification and experience required under
subdivisions (b)(2)(C)-(F) of this section; and
(C)(B) Payment of a license fee as established by rule of
the board that shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50.00).

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-55-101, concerning applications for
licensure as an electrical inspector, is amended to add a new subsection to
read as follows:
(f) A person who holds an electrical inspector license pursuant to the
qualifications under subdivision (b)(2) of this section and who is hired as
an electrical inspector shall attend the Department of Labor and Licensing
two-day training for electrical inspectors.

04-10-2025 09:46:55 LGL054

As Engrossed: S3/19/25 H4/10/25 SB445
/s/K. Hammer



































04-10-2025 09:46:55 LGL054